Nebraska, session 109, LB964.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB964 LB964
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 2 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Nebraska Public Property Disclosure Act.
Sec. 2. (1) The governing body of a political subdivision shall
hold an open and public hearing prior to any sale or lease of real
property owned by the political subdivision or any purchase of real
property by the political subdivision. Any person may appear at the
hearing and speak for or against the sale, lease, or purchase and raise
any issue regarding the property.
(2) If, following such hearing, the governing body decides to
complete such sale, lease, or purchase, the governing body shall do so
within two months after the date of such hearing. If such sale, lease, or
purchase is not completed within such two-month period, the governing
body shall hold a new hearing under subsection (1) of this section before
proceeding with such sale, lease, or purchase.
(3) The governing body shall cause to be printed and published a
notice of the sale, lease, or purchase at least ten days prior to the
sale, lease, or purchase. The notice shall be in a legal newspaper
published in or of general circulation in the political subdivision. The
notice shall state the legal description, address, assessed value,
proposed sale, lease, or purchase price, including any proposed lease
term, and the name of any proposed seller, buyer, lessor, or lessee of
the real property.
-2-